Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2967
Quorum.

(1) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, a majority of the fixed number of directors on the board of directors constitutes a quorum for the management of the affairs of the limited cooperative association.

(2) If a quorum is in attendance at the beginning of the meeting, any action taken by the board of directors present is valid even if the withdrawal of directors originally present results in the number of directors being less than the number required for a quorum.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 67.